Hawaii statutes.
§147-53 Department; grades, standards and
classifications; factors. In establishing any grades, standards, or
classifications for any food product, the department of agriculture, in
addition to such factors as may be specified in any other law, shall take into
account and base the grades, standards, or classifications upon such of the
following factors as shall be applicable to the product involved: degree of
maturity; size, measured by dimensions or weight; degree of freshness, as
determined by physical examination or chemical test or analysis; moisture
content; uniformity; color; firmness; tenderness; defects; injury; damage;
diseases; appearance; mixture of varieties; decay; conformation; soundness;
varietal characteristics or type; number of specimens per pound; nature of
pack; presence of dirt or other foreign material; condition as to temperature
and extent to which the product is hot or heating or is in a sour condition;
extent to which product is satisfactory for human or other consumption or use;
extent to which the product has been affected by handling or treatment; extent
to which the product has a commercially objectionable flavor or odor; and other
factors indicative of class, quality, or condition, and of the value or
suitability of the product involved for the commercial or other use to be made
thereof. In addition the department shall take into account any grades,
standards, or classifications for such product established by the United States
Department of Agriculture and also applicable federal grades and standard laws.
[L 1947, c 195, §3; RL 1955, §22-42; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §22; am L 1961, c
132, §2; HRS §147-53]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next